Nevada, session 83, SB248.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each public school shall establish and maintain in an
electronic format a list of:
(a) All print and digital materials available in the school
library at the public school; and
(b) All instructional materials used as a part of the school
curriculum.
2. The list required pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be posted in a publicly accessible location on an Internet
website maintained by the public school in a searchable and
downloadable format;
(b) Identify each item by title, author, International Standard
Book Number and any such other identifying features or
information that the school deems appropriate; and
(c) Be maintained and updated as necessary to accurately
reflect all print and digital materials available in the school library
and any instructional materials used as a part of the school
curriculum.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Instructional material” means any print or digital
material that is provided to a pupil or otherwise used in the
classroom as a part of the school curriculum, including, without
limitation, the curriculum of any course or program of instruction
provided or offered to pupils enrolled in the school. The term does
not include academic tests or assessments or audiovisual
materials.
(b) “International Standard Book Number” means the
numeric code which is unique to each publication of a book and
assigned to a publication of a book by the International ISBN
Agency.
(c) “Print material” means any book, graphic novel, pamphlet,
magazine, newspaper, periodical or other written material or
document that is available in a print or digital format. The term
includes, without limitation, any such material that is composed of
or includes drawings, paintings, photographs or other visual
depictions.
(d) “School library” means any area inside a public school
containing library books and other materials, including, without
limitation, paperback and hardback books.
-
*SB248*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*SB248*